Illinois, session 104th, HB833.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Electricity Infrastructure Maintenance Fee 5Law is amended by changing Section 5-1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 645/5-1)7    Sec. 5-1. Short title. This Article shall be known and and 8may be cited as the Electricity Infrastructure Maintenance Fee 9Law.10(Source: P.A. 90-561, eff. 8-1-98.)